Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 307.22, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 7. Ensure planning and programming activities comply with the statewide urban design standards and specifications developed by the statewide urban design and specifications board pursuant to section 307.22A. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 307.22A Statewide urban design and specifications board. 1. The department shall coordinate with the institute for transportation at the Iowa state university of science and technology to oversee a statewide urban design and specifications board that is responsible for developing the statewide urban design standards and specifications. The board shall publish a design manual and a specifications manual on an internet site of the Iowa state university of science and technology. 2. The statewide urban design and specifications board shall consist of the following members: a. Three employees of the department appointed by the director. House File 2667, p. 2 b. Two members appointed by the American council of engineering companies. c. One member appointed by the Iowa state association of counties. d. One member appointed by the Iowa league of cities. e. One member appointed by the home builders association of Iowa. f. One member appointed by the associated general contractors of Iowa. g. One member appointed by the master builders of Iowa. h. One member appointed by the asphalt association of Iowa. i. One member appointed by the Iowa real estate developers association. j. One member appointed by the Iowa concrete paving association. k. One member appointed by the associated builders and contractors of Iowa. l. One member appointed by the Iowa state building and construction trades council. 3. Each member of the board appointed by the director, the American council of engineering companies, the Iowa state association of counties, or the Iowa league of cities must be a professional engineer licensed under chapter 542B. 4. The regular term of appointment is four years. A vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment. 5. Members of the board shall serve without compensation from the state and are not eligible to receive reimbursement for expenses using state moneys. However, state employees serving on the board shall receive their regular compensation for board duties performed during the hours the person regularly performs work for the state. 6. The statewide urban design and specifications board shall publish on the Iowa state university of science and technologyâs internet site an analysis of any changes made to the statewide urban design and specifications manuals and provide an estimate of expected cost variations that are likely be incurred, if any, by implementing the changes. 7. The board is not subject to section 4A.5. House File 2667, p. 3 Sec. 3. Section 364.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 24. a. Prior to a city council approving a city street project that does not match the department of transportationâs design standards and specifications, the person responsible for managing the project shall submit a report to the city council describing the costs for the project that will be incurred as a result of the project not matching the department of transportationâs design standards and specifications. b. A city shall not modify the approved project design standards and specifications after a project has begun. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2667, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor